Massachusetts, session 194th, H1140.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by inserting after section 47UU the following section:- 
Section 47VV. When any provision in this chapter requires a diagnostic evaluation, 
medical necessity determination, certification, written order, prescription, or treatment 
recommendation by an attending, treating or consulting physician as a condition of coverage or 
reimbursement of health services, that requirement may be fulfilled by an advanced practice 
registered nurse practicing under section 80B of chapter 112. Nothing in this section shall be 
construed to expand the scope of practice of advanced practice registered nurses. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 176A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after section 8VV the following section:- 
Section 8WW. When any provision in this chapter requires a diagnostic evaluation, 
medical necessity determination, certification, written order, prescription, or treatment 

of 3 13 recommendation by an attending, treating or consulting physician as a condition of coverage or 
reimbursement of health services, that requirement may be fulfilled by an advanced practice 
registered nurse practicing under section 80B of chapter 112. Nothing in this section shall be 
construed to expand the scope of practice of advanced practice registered nurses. 
SECTION 3. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after section 4VV the following section:- 
Section 4WW. When any provision in this chapter requires a diagnostic evaluation, 
medical necessity determination, certification, written order, prescription, or treatment 
recommendation by an attending, treating or consulting physician as a condition of coverage or 
reimbursement of health services, that requirement may be fulfilled by an advanced practice 
registered nurse practicing under section 80B of chapter 112. Nothing in this section shall be 
construed to expand the scope of practice of advanced practice registered nurses. 
SECTION 4. Chapter 176G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after section 4NN the following section:- 
Section 4OO. When any provision in this chapter requires a diagnostic evaluation, 
medical necessity determination, certification, written order, prescription, or treatment 
recommendation by an attending, treating or consulting physician as a condition of coverage or 
reimbursement of health services, that requirement may be fulfilled by an advanced practice 
registered nurse practicing under section 80B of chapter 112. Nothing in this section shall be 
construed to expand the scope of practice of advanced practice registered nurses. 

of 3 33  SECTION 5. Subsection (a) of section 16 of chapter 176O of the General Laws, as so 
appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “physician”, in line 1, the following 
words:- “or advanced practice registered nurse”. 
SECTION 6. Said subsection (a) of section 16 of chapter 176O of the General Laws, as 
so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking out, in line 9, the words “treating physician” 
and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “treating provider”. 
SECTION 7. Subsection (b) of section 16 of chapter 176O of the General Laws, as so 
appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “treating physician”, in line 11, the 
following words:- “, treating advanced practice registered nurse”.